Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 7. Redevelopment Projects.
§ 36-52.
Cooperation by localities.

Any local government shall have the same rights and powers to cooperate with and assist authorities with respect to implementation of conservation or redevelopment plans that such locality has pursuant to §§

36-6

and

36-7

and any other provision of the Housing Authorities Law.

History.

1946, p. 280; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8e); 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 substituted “localities” for “counties, cities or towns” in the section heading; substituted “local government” for “county, city or town,” “plans” for “projects” and “locality” for “city, county or town,” inserted “implementation of conservation or” and deleted “for the purpose of assisting the development or administration of slum clearance and housing projects” following “Authorities Law.”

§ 36-52.1.
Authority for localities to create conservation or redevelopment areas.

A locality has no authority to create conservation or redevelopment areas, except through a redevelopment and housing authority and only in accordance with this chapter.

History.

1964, c. 378; 1966, c. 81; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section.

§ 36-52.2.
Acquisition of property prior to adoption of development or conservation plan in certain cities.

Whenever the governing body of any city of more than 300,000 population has approved an area for survey and planning preliminary to the adoption of a redevelopment or conservation plan, and the area includes property within such county, city or town duly designated by said governing body for educational, medical center or municipal uses, an authority may acquire such property by deed or by eminent domain.

History.

1968, c. 710.

§ 36-52.3.
Adoption and designation of “rehabilitation area.”

Whenever it appears to the governing body of any locality that a portion of such locality adjacent to an area embraced in a “conservation plan,” approved by such body pursuant to §

36-49.1

, is in the early stages of deterioration and determines that if not rehabilitated such area is likely to continue to deteriorate and become eligible for designation as a conservation area, such governing body may create a rehabilitation area.

No rehabilitation area shall be effective until notice has been sent to the property owner or owners of record in such area in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

and an ordinance approving such rehabilitation area has been adopted by the local governing body. The ordinance shall outline specific boundaries for the rehabilitation area, establish that the rehabilitation area is adjacent to a conservation area and include such properties as are in need of rehabilitation in such area.

An authority is specifically empowered to encourage and assist property owners or occupants within the rehabilitation area so designated to improve their respective holdings, by suggesting improved standards for design, construction, maintenance, renovation and use of such properties and offering encouragement or assistance in other ways including the power to lend money and make grants to said owners or occupants, directed toward prevention and elimination of deteriorating conditions within such area.

In executing the powers provided in subsection C, an authority shall have all of the rights, powers and immunities granted in connection with conservation or redevelopment plans pursuant to this chapter except the power to acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

History.

1978, c. 360; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 substituted “area” for district” in the section heading; in subsection A, substituted “locality” for “county, city or town” twice, “in the early stages of deterioration” for “deteriorating,” “and become eligible for designation as a conservation area” for “to a condition similar to that which existed in the area embraced in the ‘conservation plan”’ and “create a rehabilitation area” for “adopt a resolution declaring and designating such an area as a ‘rehabilitation district”’ and inserted “continue to”; added subsection B; redesignated former subsections B and C as subsections C and D; substituted “area” for “district” twice in subsection C; and in subsection D, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B” and “plans” for “projects” and inserted “conservation or.”

§ 36-53.
Making property available for conservation or redevelopment.

An authority may make land in a conservation or redevelopment area available for purchase or use by nongovernmental persons or entities or public agencies in accordance with the conservation or redevelopment plan. Such land may be made available at its fair value, which represents the value at which the authority determines such land should be made available in order that it may be developed, conserved or redeveloped for the purposes specified in such plan.

To assure that land acquired in a conservation or redevelopment area is used in accordance with the conservation or redevelopment plan, an authority, upon the sale or lease of such land, shall obligate purchasers or lessees: (1) to use the land for the purpose designated in the conservation or redevelopment plan; (2) to begin the building of their improvements within a period of time which the authority fixes as reasonable; and (3) to comply with such other conditions as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Any such obligations by the purchaser shall be covenants and conditions running with the land where the authority so stipulates.

History.

1946, p. 280; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8f); 1970, c. 222; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “area available for purchase or” for “project available for” and “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private enterprise,” and deleted “(whether expressed in terms of rental or capital price)” following “the value” in the second sentence; and substituted “area” for “project” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 36-54.
Aid from federal government.

An authority may borrow money or accept contributions from the federal government to assist in its undertaking redevelopment projects. An authority may do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure such financial aid (including obligating itself in any contract with the federal government for annual contributions to convey to the federal government the project to which the contract relates upon the occurrence of a substantial default thereunder), in the same manner as it may do to secure such aid in connection with slum clearance and housing projects.

History.

1946, p. 280; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8g).

§ 36-55.
Bonds to be legal investments and security.

Bonds or other obligations issued by an authority in connection with projects authorized under this chapter shall be security for public deposits and legal investments to the same extent and for the same persons, institutions, associations, corporations and other bodies and officers as bonds or other obligations issued by an authority in connection with the development of slum clearance or housing projects.

History.

1946, p. 280; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8h); 1964, c. 378.